Maryland, session 2025, SB0424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–630.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Urban highway” means a highway, other than an expressway, that is:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0424*

SENATE BILL 424
(i) 1. Constructed with a curb and gutter and an enclosed type
storm drainage system;
2. Located in an urban area and on which is located a public
facility that creates appreciable pedestrian traffic along the highway from adjacent areas;
3. Located within urban boundaries as defined by the U.S.
Census Bureau; or
4. Located within the boundaries of a municipal corporation;
and
(ii) Part of the State highway system.
21–801.1.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the maximum speed limits are:
(1) 15 miles per hour in alleys in Baltimore County;
(2) 30 miles per hour on:
(i) All highways in a business district; and
(ii) Undivided highways in a residential district;
(3) 35 miles per hour on divided highways in a residential district;
(4) 50 miles per hour on undivided highways in other locations; and
(5) 55 miles per hour on divided highways in other locations.
21–802.
(a) [If] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF, on the basis of an
engineering and traffic investigation, the State Highway Administration determines that
any maximum speed limit specified in this subtitle is greater or less than reasonable or
safe under existing conditions on any part of a highway under its jurisdiction, it may
establish a reasonable and safe maximum speed limit for that part of the highway.
(b) An engineering and traffic investigation is not required [to]:
(1) TO conform a posted maximum speed limit in effect on December 31,
1974, to a different limit specified in § 21–801.1(b) of this subtitle; OR

SENATE BILL 424 3
(2) FOR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO DECREASE BY 5
MILES PER HOUR THE MAXIMUM SPEED LIMIT AUTHORIZED UNDER § 21–801.1(B)(2)
AND (3) OF THIS SUBTITLE ON ANY URBAN HIGHWAY, AS DEFINED IN § 8–630 OF THIS
ARTICLE, UNDER ITS JURISDICTION.
(c) Under this section, the State Highway Administration may:
(1) Establish a maximum speed limit to apply at all times or only at
specified times; and
(2) Establish differing limits for different times of day, different types of
vehicles, different weather conditions, or other factors bearing on safe speeds.
(d) An altered maximum speed limit established under this section is effective
when posted on appropriate signs giving notice of the limit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.